Utah statutes.
17-50-106.   Exemption from state licensure by Division of Real Estate.

In accordance with Section 61-2f-202, an employee of a county is exempt from licensure under Title 61, Chapter 2f, Real Estate Licensing and Practices Act:

(1)  when engaging in an act on behalf of the county in accordance with:

(a)  this title; or

(b)  Title 11, Cities, Counties, and Local Taxing Units; and

(2)  if the act described in Subsection (1) is related to one or more of the following:

(a)  acquiring real estate, including by eminent domain;

(b)  disposing of real estate;

(c)  providing services that constitute property management, as defined in Section 61-2f-102; or

(d)  leasing real estate.

